Wisconsin, session 2025, AB341.
do enact as follows:AB341,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB341,27Section 2. 20.255 (3) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:AB341,2,9820.255 (3) (cm) Grants for prospective school social workers. The amounts in 9the schedule for the grants under s. 115.429 to prospective school social workers.AB341,310Section 3. 115.429 of the statutes is created to read:AB341,2,1311115.429 Grants for prospective school social workers. (1) In this 12section, “member of a racial minority group” means an individual who is any of the 13following:AB341,2,1414(a) A Black American.AB341,2,1515(b) An American Indian or Alaskan native.AB341,2,1616(c) A Hispanic, as defined in s. 16.287 (1) (d).AB341,2,1717(d) An individual of Asian or Pacific Island origin.AB341,2,1818(e) An individual whose ancestry includes 2 or more races.AB341,2,2119(2) The department shall establish and administer a grant program to award 20to individuals who meet the eligibility requirements under sub. (3) grants for the 21costs of acquiring education needed for licensure as a school social worker.AB341,3,222(3) Grants may be awarded under this section only to an individual who is a 1member of a racial minority group and who meets one of the following 2requirements:AB341,3,33(a) The individual is an employee of a school board.AB341,3,64(b) The individual is enrolled in an institution of higher education or an 5accredited graduate school in a program of study leading to licensure as a school 6social worker.AB341,3,77(4) The department may promulgate rules to implement this section.AB341,48Section 4. Effective date.AB341,3,109(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 10publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.AB341,3,1111